Utah statutes.
20A-3-304.   Application for absentee ballot -- Time for filing and voting.

(1)  Any registered voter who wishes to vote an absentee ballot may either:

(a)  file an absentee ballot application with the appropriate election officer for an official absentee ballot as provided in this section; or

(b)  vote in person at the office of the appropriate election officer as provided in Section 20A-3-306.

(2) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (2)(b), each election officer shall prepare blank applications for absentee ballot applications in substantially the following form:

"I, ____, a qualified elector, residing at ____ Street, ____ City, ____ County, Utah apply for an official absentee ballot to be voted by me at the election.

Date ________ (month\day\year) Signed ___________________________

Voter"

(b)  Each election officer shall prepare blank applications for absentee ballot applications for regular primary elections and for the Western States Presidential Primary in substantially the following form:

"I, ____, a qualified elector, residing at ____ Street, ____ City, ____ County, Utah apply for an official absentee ballot for the _______________ political party to be voted by me at the primary election.

I understand that I must be affiliated with or authorized to vote the political party's ballot that I request.

Dated _________ (month\day\year) ____ Signed ___________________________

Voter"

(c)  If requested by the applicant, the election officer shall:

(i)  mail or fax the application blank to the absentee voter; or

(ii)  deliver the application blank to any voter who personally applies for it at the office of the election officer.

(3) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (3)(b), a voter who wishes to vote by absentee ballot shall file the application for an absentee ballot with the appropriate election officer no later than the Friday before election day.

(b)  Overseas applicants shall file their applications with the appropriate election officer no later than 20 days before election day.

(4) (a)  A county clerk may establish a permanent absentee voter list.

(b)  The clerk shall place on the list the name of any person who:

(i)  requests permanent absentee voter status; and

(ii)  meets the requirements of this section.

(c) (i)  Each year, the clerk shall mail a questionnaire to each person whose name is on the absentee voter list.

(ii)  The questionnaire shall allow the absentee person to verify the voter's residence.

(iii)  The clerk may remove the names of any voter from the absentee voter registration list if:

(A)  the voter is no longer listed in the official register; or

(B)  the voter fails to verify the voter's residence and absentee status.

(d)  The clerk shall provide a copy of the permanent absentee voter list to election officers for use in elections.

